Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 417.831 is amended to read:
417.831. [(1) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Tribal advisory committee”  means the committee established by the Department of Early
Learning and Care for the purpose of  advising the Early Learning Council on the Tribal Early
Learning Hub.]
[(b) “Tribal Early Learning Hub” means the entity designated by  the Early Learning Council, in
consultation with  the tribal advisory committee, to coordinate early learning services provided to the
tribal communities of this state, as determined by rules adopted by the  Early Learning Council in
consultation with the tribal advisory committee. ]
[(2) The Early  Learning Council shall implement and coordinate a system that coordinates the de-
livery of early learning services to the  tribal communities of this state through the direction of the
Tribal Early Learning Hub. The Tribal Early Learning Hub shall be separate and  distinct from the
Early Learning Hubs designated under ORS 417.827. ]
[(3) The Department of  Early Learning and Care shall establish a tribal advisory committee. The
tribal advisory committee shall consist of  21 members appointed by the Department of Early Learning
and Care in consultation with the nine federally recognized Indian tribes of this state as follows: ]
[(a) Two representatives from each of the nine federally recognized Indian tribes of this state; ]
[(b) One representative from  the Commission on Indian Services, who shall be a nonvoting
member;]
[(c) One representative of the Early Learning Council, who shall be a nonvoting member; and ]
[(d) One representative  of the Department of Early Learning and Care, who shall be a nonvoting
member.]
[(4) The tribal  advisory committee shall advise the Early Learning Council on the delivery of early
care and education services to the tribal communities of this state in a culturally specific  manner. The
Early Learning Council shall adopt rules related to the Tribal Early Learning Hub  in consultation
with the tribal advisory  committee, including rules that prescribe the requirements for accountability
and services provided. ]
(1) As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Caregiver” means an individual who provides ongoing care for a plan child.
(b) “Plan child” means a child  enrolled in early childhood care or education programs
who:
Enrolled House Bill 2815 (HB 2815-A) Page 1
(A) Is eight years of age or younger;
(B) Is Native American or Alaska Native; and
(C) Has experienced disproportionate results in early  childhood care or education due to
historical practices, as identified by the Early Learning Council by rule.
(c) “Tribal educator” means a teacher, child care provider, administrator or other school
or child care employee who:
(A) Is Native American or Alaska Native; and
(B) Provides early childhood care or education services to any children  eight years of age
or younger.
(2) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall develop and  implement a statewide
early learning and care plan for plan children. In developing the plan, the department shall:
(a) In a manner consistent with ORS 182.164 and  Executive Order 96-30, consult the nine
federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon and state agencies with relevant  expertise.
Consultation under this paragraph must be undertaken with respect for tribal sovereignty,
customs and culture.
(b) Solicit input from  the advisory committee established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The plan developed and implemented under this section must, at  minimum, address
the following objectives:
(a) Support the developmental, child  care and educational needs and goals of plan chil-
dren in a culturally appropriate manner.
(b) Increase  access for plan children to early learning system resources and programs
administered by the department.
(c) Support culturally responsive curricula that honor the Native American experience
in Oregon, including tribal history, sovereignty issues,  culture, treaty rights, government,
socioeconomic experiences and current events.
(d) Improve early childhood development and kindergarten readiness for plan children.
(e) Increase literacy and numeracy levels for plan children  between kindergarten and
grade three.
(f) Provide education, training and professional development opportunities for educators
and child care providers who serve plan children.
(g) Foster parental and familial engagement in  the development and education of plan
children.
(h) Support the preservation and revitalization of Native American language and culture
in Oregon.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section may provide strategies to:
(a) Support experiential curricula, including curricula on Native American language and
culture.
(b) Increase the  number of educators or child care providers who are providing early
childhood care or services to plan children.
(c) Increase the number of tribal educators who are providing early  childhood care or
education services to children eight years of age or younger who are not plan children.
(d) Prepare plan children for successful transitions, including  from prekindergarten
through post-secondary education.
(e) Achieve any other outcomes identified by  rule by the council in consultation with the
nine federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon.
(5) The department shall establish and administer a grant program to award  moneys to
each of the nine  federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon for the purpose of implementing
the objectives and strategies of the plan described in this section.
(6) The  council, in consultation with the department, shall adopt rules necessary for the
administration of this section, including rules establishing eligibility criteria for  receipt of
moneys under the grant program.
Enrolled House Bill 2815 (HB 2815-A) Page 2
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall establish an advisory
committee called the Oregon Tribal Early Learning Alliance. The advisory  committee shall
advise the department on:
(a) The development and implementation of the plan  and grant program described in ORS
417.831.
(b) The distribution of  moneys for technical assistance, professional development,
infrastructure or other support  to plan children, caregivers, tribal educators or federally
recognized Indian tribes in Oregon under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(c) Any other subject related to the delivery of culturally and linguistically appropriate
early childhood care or education services to plan children in this state.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of 18 voting members and a minimum of  nine
nonvoting members. The department,  in consultation with the nine federally recognized In-
dian tribes in Oregon, shall appoint:
(a) Two voting members from each of the nine federally recognized  Indian tribes in
Oregon.
(b) At least two nonvoting members who are parents or caregivers of a plan child.
(c) At least two  nonvoting members who are tribal educators or providers of early
childhood care or education programs that are operated by a federally recognized Indian
tribe in Oregon.
(3)(a) In addition to the appointments made under subsection (2)  of this section, the de-
partment shall appoint five nonvoting, ex officio members as follows:
(A) One member who is the Early Learning System Director,  or the designee of the di-
rector.
(B) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education.
(C) One member who is a representative  of the Department of Human Services with ex-
pertise in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq.).
(D) One member who is a representative of the Oregon Health Authority.
(E) One member who is a representative of the  Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion.
(b) In addition to the appointments made under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
Department of Early Learning and Care may appoint as a nonvoting, ex officio  member a
representative from any state agency.
(4) The term  of office and responsibilities of the members of the advisory committee shall
be determined by the advisory committee.
(5) A majority of voting members of the advisory committee constitutes a  quorum for
the transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the advisory committee  requires the approval of a majority of the
voting members of the advisory committee.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the  Department of Early Learning and Care, in
consultation with the nine federally  recognized Indian tribes in Oregon, shall make an ap-
pointment to become effective immediately.
(8) The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places specified by a majority
of the voting members of the advisory committee.
(9) The advisory committee may adopt rules  necessary for the operation of the advisory
committee.
SECTION 3.
(1) The  Tribal Early Learning Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys  in the Tribal Early
Learning Fund must be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys appropriated or otherwise made  available by the Legis-
lative Assembly  for deposit in the fund, interest earned on moneys in the fund and moneys
otherwise deposited in the fund from any source.
Enrolled House Bill 2815 (HB 2815-A) Page 3
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Department of Early
Learning and Care to carry out the statewide plan and grant program under ORS 417.831.
(4) To further the objectives and strategies described  in ORS 417.831, the department
shall retain up to five percent of the moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly each
biennium for deposit in  the fund to provide technical assistance, professional development,
infrastructure or other support  to plan children, caregivers, tribal educators or federally
recognized Indian tribes in Oregon.
Passed by House June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2815 (HB 2815-A) Page 4